Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-140
Disciplinary action; board; initiation of proceedings.

The board may initiate proceedings under the Public Accountancy Act either on its own motion or on the complaint of any person.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 35, p. 68;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 34.